Maryland, session 2025, SB0588.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
7–118.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0588*

SENATE BILL 588
(2) “STUDENT OF THE FEMALE SEX” MEANS A STUDENT WHOSE
BIOLOGICAL SEX IS FEMALE.
(3) “STUDENT OF THE MALE SEX” MEANS A STUDENT WHOSE
BIOLOGICAL SEX IS MALE.
(B) THIS SECTION APPLIES TO:
(1) PUBLIC HIGH SCHOOLS; AND
(2) NONPUBLIC HIGH SCHOOLS FOR WHICH THE STUDENT ATHLETES
OR ATHLETIC TEAMS COMPETE AGAINST STUDENT ATHLETES OR ATHLETIC TEAMS
FROM PUBLIC HIGH SCHOOLS IN THE STATE.
(C) (1) AN INTERSCHOLASTIC OR INTRAMURAL JUNIOR VARSITY OR
VARSITY ATHLETIC TEAM OR SPORT THAT IS SPONSORED BY A PUBLIC OR
NONPUBLIC HIGH SCHOOL SHALL BE EXPRESSLY DESIGNATED AS ONE OF THE
FOLLOWING:
(I) A BOYS’, MALE, OR MEN’S TEAM OR SPORT;
(II) A GIRLS’, FEMALE, OR WOMEN’S TEAM OR SPORT; OR
(III) A COEDUCATIONAL OR MIXED TEAM OR SPORT.
(2) AN INTERSCHOLASTIC OR INTRAMURAL JUNIOR VARSITY OR
VARSITY ATHLETIC TEAM OR SPORT DESIGNATED FOR GIRLS, FEMALES, OR WOMEN
MAY NOT INCLUDE STUDENTS OF THE MALE SEX.
(D) A GOVERNMENTAL ENTITY, A LICENSING OR ACCREDITING
ORGANIZATION, OR AN ATHLETIC ASSOCIATION OR ORGANIZATION MAY NOT ACCEPT
A COMPLAINT, CONDUCT AN INVESTIGATION, OR TAKE ANY OTHER ADVERSE ACTION
AGAINST A SCHOOL FOR MAINTAINING SEPARATE INTERSCHOLASTIC OR
INTRAMURAL JUNIOR VARSITY OR VARSITY ATHLETIC TEAMS OR SPORTS FOR
STUDENTS OF THE FEMALE SEX.
(E) (1) A STUDENT WHO IS DEPRIVED OF AN ATHLETIC OPPORTUNITY OR
SUFFERS ANY DIRECT OR INDIRECT HARM AS A RESULT OF A VIOLATION OF THIS
SECTION MAY BRING A CIVIL ACTION AGAINST THE SCHOOL THE STUDENT ATTENDS.
(2) A STUDENT WHO IS SUBJECT TO RETALIATION OR OTHER
ADVERSE ACTION BY A SCHOOL OR AN ATHLETIC ASSOCIATION OR ORGANIZATION

SENATE BILL 588 3
AS A RESULT OF REPORTING A VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION TO AN EMPLOYEE OR
REPRESENTATIVE OF THE SCHOOL, ATHLETIC ASSOCIATION OR ORGANIZATION, OR
ANY STATE OR FEDERAL AGENCY WITH OVERSIGHT OF SCHOOLS IN THE STATE MAY
BRING A CIVIL ACTION AGAINST THE SCHOOL OR ATHLETIC ASSOCIATION OR
ORGANIZATION.
(F) THIS SECTION MAY BE KNOWN AND CITED AS THE FAIRNESS IN GIRLS’
SPORTS ACT.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, if any provision of this Act or
the application thereof to any person or circumstance is held invalid for any reason in a
court of competent jurisdiction, the provision shall be construed to give the provision the
maximum effect permitted by law unless the provision is held to be absolutely invalid.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, if any provision of this Act or
the application thereof to any person or circumstance is held invalid for any reason in a
court of competent jurisdiction, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or any other
application of this Act that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application,
and for this purpose the provisions of this Act are declared severable.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.